District of Columbia statutes.
1-621.54

Meetings and records.

(a)

The Advisory Committee shall hold no fewer than 2 meetings per year. The chairperson of the Advisory Committee shall fix the time and place of each meeting.

(b)

The meetings of the Advisory Committee shall not be subject to subchapter IV of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-571 et seq.].

(c)

Except for the written recommendations transmitted to the Chief Financial Officer pursuant to § 1-621.53(b), any record or report of the Advisory Committee shall not be made available as a public record under § 2-532.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2154
as added Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-151, § 2(d), 61 DCR 8893